test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-tei_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - tei: # Noun 17 'eng /est täi/fin' - full paradigm
     tei+N+Sg+Nom: tei
     tei+N+Sg+Gen: tei
     tei+N+Sg+Par: teiõ
     tei+N+Sg+Dat: teiõn
     tei+N+Sg+Ins: teiõks
     tei+N+Sg+Ill: teiõ
     tei+N+Sg+Ela: teiõst
     tei+N+Pl+Nom: teid
     tei+N+Pl+Gen: teid
     tei+N+Pl+Par: tēḑi
     tei+N+Pl+Dat: teidõn
     tei+N+Pl+Ins: teidõks
     tei+N+Pl+Ill: tēži
     tei+N+Pl+Ela: tēšti
